Alabama, session 2026rs, HB292.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 32-6-130, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§32-6-130
(a) Any veteran, as defined in Section 31-5-1, who is a
resident of this state and who is suffering a physical
disability which that requires that any motor vehicle he or
she operates be equipped with special mechanical control
Page 1

she operates be equipped with special mechanical control
HB292 INTRODUCED
devices or whose physical disability exceeds is at least 50
percent, upon application accompanied by proof of eligibility
to the judge of probate of the county for the special license
plates provided herein, as may be prescribed by the State
Department of Revenue, and upon payment of five dollars ($5),
unless exempted from the payment of such the fee by law, shall
be issued license plates, by the judge of probate as provided
by law, for private or pleasure motor vehicles, upon which,
in.
(b) In lieu of the number now prescribed by law shall
be inscribed in legible letters the words, "Disabled Veteran,"
and shall designate the branch of service and an identifying
number as prescribed by the State Department of Revenue.
(c) The plates shall not be transferable.
(d) The fee established by this section shall be in
lieu of the regular license fee now required for motor
vehicles and shall be used to defray the cost of issuing the
distinctive license plates.
(b)(e) In lieu of applying the registration fee of five
dollars ($5) to the disabled veteran license plate category
provided for in subsection (a), the registration fee may be
applied to any license plate category in which the disabled
veteran qualifies to obtain a license plate. Any additional
fee required for a plate from a distinctive or personalized
license plate category shall still be required in order to
obtain the plate."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on January
1, 2027.
Page 2